Utah statutes.
13-10-3.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Fixed" means embodied in a recording or other tangible medium of expression, by or under the authority of the author, so that the matter embodied in the recording or other tangible medium of expression is sufficiently permanent or stable to permit it to be perceived, reproduced, or otherwise communicated for a period of more than transitory duration.

(2)  "Owner" means the person, corporation, partnership, or business association who owns the sounds fixed in a master phonograph record, master disc, master wire, master tape, master film, or other device used for reproducing recorded sounds on phonograph records, discs, wires, tapes, films, or other articles or materials in which sound is recorded and from which the transferred recorded sounds are directly or indirectly derived.

